District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-303.12

Emergency procurements.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 312, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(p), 44 DCR 1423
June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-122, § 2(e), 53 DCR 2834
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 107, 56 DCR 1117
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1183.12.